Oklahoma, session 2025, SB706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1-117, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-117. A. The general fund of any school district is


hereby defined as a current expense fund and shall consist of all


revenue or monies that can legally be expended within a certain


specified fiscal year, but shall not be considered as including any


money derived from a special building fund levy made in accordance

Req. No. 167 Page 1


with the provisions of Section 10 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution, nor shall it include any monies derived from the sale


of bonds issued under the provisions of Section 26 of Article X of


the Oklahoma Constitution. All monies derived from the proceeds of


the school levies made pursuant to the provisions of Section 9 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution shall be placed in the


general fund provided by this section. Expenditures from the


general fund shall be noncapital in nature. All monies derived from


state-dedicated revenue, state-appropriated revenue unless otherwise


provided for by law, and county sources shall be placed in the


general fund provided for by this section. Except as provided for


in subsections F, K, and L of this section, a district shall not be


authorized to make capital expenditures as defined by this section


from the general fund.


B. For purposes of this section, state-dedicated revenue shall


be any registration or license fees, taxes, or penalties collected


at the state level and distributed to common school districts.


County sources shall be all funds collected by the county and


distributed to common school districts but shall not include any


funds derived from the building fund levy made in accordance with


the provisions of Section 10 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution or funds derived from the sinking fund levy made in


accordance with the provisions of Section 26 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution.

Req. No. 167 Page 2


C. For the purposes of this section, a capital expenditure


shall be an expenditure which results in the acquisition of fixed


assets or additions to fixed assets. Capital expenditures shall


include, but shall not be limited to, purchases of land or existing


buildings, purchases of real property, improvements of grounds and


sites for construction purposes, all expenditures for construction


of buildings unless authorized by the State Board of Education or


the State Board of Career and Technology Education upon application


to the appropriate state board pursuant to subsection F of this


section, additions to buildings, remodeling of buildings if such


remodeling involves changes to roof structures or load-bearing


walls, professional services, salaries and expenses of architects


and engineers hired or assigned to capital projects except for such


services, salaries and expenses as are applicable in preparation for


a bond issue, expenditures for the initial installation and


extension of service systems and built-in heat or air equipment to


existing buildings, expenditures for the replacement of a building


which has been destroyed, installments and lease payments on


property, including interest, that have a terminal date and result


in the acquisition of property, and expenditures for preliminary


studies made prior to the time that authority to proceed with a


construction project is given if authority is received within the


same fiscal year that the expenditure was made.



Req. No. 167 Page 3


D. Noncapital expenditures shall include, but shall not be


limited to, expenditures for maintenance, repair, and replacement of


property and equipment, initial or additional purchases of furniture


and equipment, direct expenses for maintenance of plant, including


grounds, salaries for maintenance of plant, including salaries for


the upkeep of grounds, and repair and replacement of building


structures which do not add to existing facilities and which do not


involve changes in roof structures or load-bearing walls and which


are not classified as a capital expenditure by this section.


E. The State Board of Education shall adopt and amend


regulations regarding the classification, definition, and financial


administration of funds, accounts, and expenditures in accordance


with the requirements of this section.


F. A school district shall be authorized to make capital


expenditures from the general fund to defray the cost of rebuilding


a school building only if a school building or facility has been


destroyed by a fire or natural disaster, such as flood, tornado, or


other act of God, or by an act of a public enemy of the United


States or this state and monies received by the district through


insurance coverage, federal reimbursement, contributions, and


allocation from the State Board of Education from the State Public


Common School Building Equalization Fund are insufficient to rebuild


the facility. Capital expenditures from the general fund pursuant


to this subsection shall be limited to an amount necessary to defray

Req. No. 167 Page 4


the cost of rebuilding the facility which exceeds monies received by


the school district through insurance, federal reimbursement,


contributions, and state allocations.


G. Schools which receive gifts or, donations, or state-


appropriated monies for the purpose of capital expenditures or


projects shall place such monies in the building fund, as provided


by Section 1-118 of this title, and not in the general fund. School


districts which receive gifts, grants, or donations of monies for


noncapital expenditures may place the monies in the general fund,


and such monies shall not be required to be used during the year in


which the money was received but may accumulate from year to year


and shall not be considered a part of the general fund collections


when calculating the general fund carryover as provided for in


subsection G of Section 18-200.1 of this title.


H. School districts which receive monies from rental, sale, or


lease of buildings, impact aid monies, or grants, gifts, or


donations for capital purposes, whether from state, federal, or


other sources, may place such monies in the building fund authorized


by Section 1-118 of this title or the general fund authorized by


this section.


I. Any construction of a building included as a capital


expenditure from the general fund of a school district which is


authorized and has had a contractual agreement concerning such


construction executed prior to July 1, 1991, may be proceeded with

Req. No. 167 Page 5


and completed as authorized prior to July 1, 1991, as a capital


expenditure from such general fund.


J. School districts receiving revenues authorized by Section 9B


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution shall be authorized to


make capital expenditures from the general revenue fund no greater


than the amount levied by the incentive millage.


K. Upon the approval of the State Board of Education, a school


district shall be authorized to make capital expenditures as defined


in this section from its general fund if:


1. A bond issue has been rejected at an election by the school


district electors voting on that question within the current school


year, as certified by the secretary of the county election board; or


2. The school district has voted indebtedness at any time


within the preceding three (3) school years through the issuance of


bonds or through approval by voters of issuance of new bonds for


more than eighty-five percent (85%) of the maximum allowable


pursuant to the provisions of Section 26 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution as shown on the school district budget filed


with the State Board of Equalization for the current school year and


certifications by the Attorney General prior to April 1 of the


current school year. The State Board of Education shall establish


the rules to administer the provisions of this subsection which


shall include, but not be limited to, specification of a maximum


amount of general fund monies to be used for capital expenditures,

Req. No. 167 Page 6


the purposes for which such funds may be expended, and the period of


time in which such funds shall be encumbered.


L. Other provisions of this section notwithstanding, a school


district shall be authorized to make capital expenditures from the


general fund if the total assessed property valuation per average


daily attendance is less than sixty percent (60%) of the state


average total assessed property valuation per average daily


attendance and if, for each year in which general fund revenue is


used for capital expenditures, the district has voted the five-mill


building fund levy authorized in Section 10 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution and has voted indebtedness through the


issuance of new bonds for at least eighty-five percent (85%) within


the last three (3) years of the maximum allowable pursuant to the


provisions of Section 26 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution


as shown on the school district budget filed with the State Board of


Equalization for the current school year and certifications by the


Attorney General prior to April 1 of the school year. Provided, the


maximum amount of general fund revenue used for capital expenditures


pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed five percent (5%) of


the total yearly revenue to the general fund. Said Such fund may


not be used for capital expenditures for more than five (5)


consecutive years and may only be utilized for remodeling or


construction of classroom facilities and such ancillary facilities


to said such classrooms as may be necessary. Provided, further, the

Req. No. 167 Page 7


State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify in writing,


prior to the expenditure of the funds for which provision is made in


this subsection, that such expenditures are in compliance with the


provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-200.1, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 18-200.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 18-200.1. A. Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year,


and each school year thereafter, each school district shall have its


initial allocation of State Aid calculated based on the state


dedicated revenues actually collected during the preceding fiscal


year, the adjusted assessed valuation of the preceding year, and the


weighted average daily membership for the school district of the


preceding school year. Each school district shall submit the


following data based on the first nine (9) weeks, to be used in the


calculation of the average daily membership of the school district:


1. Student enrollment by grade level;


2. Pupil category counts; and


3. Transportation supplement data.


On or before December 30, the State Department of Education


shall determine each school district’s current year allocation


pursuant to subsection D of this section. The State Department of


Education shall complete an audit, using procedures established by


the Department, of the student enrollment by grade level data, pupil

Req. No. 167 Page 8


category counts, and transportation supplement data to be used in


the State Aid Formula pursuant to subsection D of this section by


December 1 and by January 15 shall notify each school district of


the district’s final State Aid allocation for the current school


year. The January payment of State Aid and each subsequent payment


for the remainder of the school year shall be based on the final


State Aid allocation as calculated in subsection D of this section.


Except for reductions made due to the assessment of penalties by the


State Department of Education according to law, the January payment


of State Aid and each subsequent payment for the remainder of the


school year shall not decrease by an amount more than the amount


that the current chargeable revenue increases for that district.


B. The State Department of Education shall retain not less than


one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of the total funds appropriated


for financial support of schools, to be used to make midyear


adjustments in State Aid and which shall be reflected in the final


allocations. If the amount of appropriated funds, including the one


and one-half percent (1 1/2%) retained, remaining after January 1 of


each year is not sufficient to fully fund the final allocations, the


Department shall recalculate each school district’s remaining


allocation pursuant to subsection D of this section using the


reduced amount of appropriated funds.


C. On and after July 1, 1997, the amount of State Aid each


district shall receive shall be the sum of the Foundation Aid, the

Req. No. 167 Page 9


Salary Incentive Aid, and the Transportation Supplement, as adjusted


pursuant to the provisions of subsection G of this section and


Section 18-112.2 of this title; provided, no district having per


pupil revenue in excess of three hundred percent (300%) of the


average per pupil revenue of all districts shall receive any State


Aid or Supplement in State Aid.


The July calculation of per pupil revenue shall be determined by


dividing the district’s second preceding year’s total weighted


average daily membership (ADM) into the district’s second preceding


year’s total revenues excluding federal revenue, insurance loss


payments, reimbursements, recovery of overpayments and refunds,


unused reserves, prior expenditures recovered, prior year surpluses,


and less the amount of any transfer fees paid in that year.


The December calculation of per pupil revenue shall be


determined by dividing the district’s preceding year’s total


weighted average daily membership (ADM) into the district’s


preceding year’s total revenues excluding federal revenue, insurance


loss payments, reimbursements, recovery of overpayments and refunds,


unused reserves, prior expenditures recovered, prior year surpluses,


and less the amount of any transfer fees paid in that year.


D. For the 1997-98 school year, and each school year


thereafter, Foundation Aid, the Transportation Supplement, and


Salary Incentive Aid shall be calculated as follows:



Req. No. 167 Page 10


1. Foundation Aid shall be determined by subtracting the amount


of the Foundation Program Income from the cost of the Foundation


Program and adding to this difference the Transportation Supplement.


a. The Foundation Program shall be a district’s higher


weighted average daily membership based on the first


nine (9) weeks of the current school year or the


preceding school year of a school district, as


determined by the provisions of subsection A of


Section 18-201.1 of this title and paragraphs 1, 2, 3,


and 4 of subsection B of Section 18-201.1 of this


title, multiplied by the Base Foundation Support


Level. However, for the portion of weighted


membership derived from nonresident, transferred


pupils enrolled in online courses, the Foundation


Program shall be a district’s weighted average daily


membership of the preceding school year or the first


nine (9) weeks of the current school year, whichever


is greater, as determined by the provisions of


subsection A of Section 18-201.1 of this title and


paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4 of subsection B of Section


18-201.1 of this title, multiplied by the Base


Foundation Support Level.


b. The Foundation Program Income shall be the sum of the


following:

Req. No. 167 Page 11


(1) The the adjusted assessed valuation of the


current school year of the school district, minus


the previous year protested ad valorem tax


revenues held as prescribed in Section 2884 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, multiplied by


the mills levied pursuant to subsection (c) of


Section 9 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution, if applicable, as adjusted in


subsection (c) of Section 8A of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution. For purposes of this


subsection, the “adjusted assessed valuation of


the current school year” shall be the adjusted


assessed valuation on which tax revenues are


collected during the current school year, and


(2) Seventy-five seventy-five percent (75%) of the


amount received by the school district from the


proceeds of the county levy during the preceding


fiscal year, as levied pursuant to subsection (b)


of Section 9 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution, and


(3) motor vehicle collections, and


(4) gross production tax, and


(5) state apportionment, and


(6) R.E.A. tax.

Req. No. 167 Page 12


The items listed in divisions (3), (4), (5), and (6)


of this subparagraph shall consist of the amounts


actually collected from such sources during the


preceding fiscal year calculated on a per capita basis


on the unit provided for by law for the distribution


of each such revenue.


2. The Transportation Supplement shall be equal to the average


daily haul times the per capita allowance times the appropriate


transportation factor.


a. The average daily haul shall be the number of children


in a district who are legally transported and who live


one and one-half (1 1/2) miles or more from school.


b. The per capita allowance shall be determined using the


following chart:


PER CAPITA PER CAPITA


DENSITY FIGURE ALLOWANCE DENSITY FIGURE ALLOWANCE


.3000 - .3083 $167.00 .9334 - .9599 $99.00


.3084 - .3249 $165.00 .9600 - .9866 $97.00


.3250 - .3416 $163.00 .9867 - 1.1071 $95.00


.3417 - .3583 $161.00 1.1072 - 1.3214 $92.00


.3584 - .3749 $158.00 1.3215 - 1.5357 $90.00


.3750 - .3916 $156.00 1.5358 - 1.7499 $88.00


.3917 - .4083 $154.00 1.7500 - 1.9642 $86.00


.4084 - .4249 $152.00 1.9643 - 2.1785 $84.00

Req. No. 167 Page 13


.4250 - .4416 $150.00 2.1786 - 2.3928 $81.00


.4417 - .4583 $147.00 2.3929 - 2.6249 $79.00


.4584 - .4749 $145.00 2.6250 - 2.8749 $77.00


.4750 - .4916 $143.00 2.8750 - 3.1249 $75.00


.4917 - .5083 $141.00 3.1250 - 3.3749 $73.00


.5084 - .5249 $139.00 3.3750 - 3.6666 $70.00


.5250 - .5416 $136.00 3.6667 - 3.9999 $68.00


.5417 - .5583 $134.00 4.0000 - 4.3333 $66.00


.5584 - .5749 $132.00 4.3334 - 4.6666 $64.00


.5750 - .5916 $130.00 4.6667 - 4.9999 $62.00


.5917 - .6133 $128.00 5.0000 - 5.5000 $59.00


.6134 - .6399 $125.00 5.5001 - 6.0000 $57.00


.6400 - .6666 $123.00 6.0001 - 6.5000 $55.00


.6667 - .6933 $121.00 6.5001 - 7.0000 $53.00


.6934 - .7199 $119.00 7.0001 - 7.3333 $51.00


.7200 - .7466 $117.00 7.3334 - 7.6667 $48.00


.7467 - .7733 $114.00 7.6668 - 8.0000 $46.00


.7734 - .7999 $112.00 8.0001 - 8.3333 $44.00


.8000 - .8266 $110.00 8.3334 - 8.6667 $42.00


.8267 - .8533 $108.00 8.6668 - 9.0000 $40.00


.8534 - .8799 $106.00 9.0001 - 9.3333 $37.00


.8800 - .9066 $103.00 9.3334 - 9.6667 $35.00


.9067 - .9333 $101.00 9.6668 or more $33.00


c. The formula transportation factor shall be 2.0.

Req. No. 167 Page 14


3. Salary Incentive Aid shall be determined as follows:


a. Multiply the Incentive Aid guarantee by the district’s


higher weighted average daily membership based on the


first nine (9) weeks of the current school year or the


preceding school year of a school district, as


determined by the provisions of subsection A of


Section 18-201.1 of this title and paragraphs 1, 2, 3,


and 4 of subsection B of Section 18-201.1 of this


title.


b. Divide the district’s adjusted assessed valuation of


the current school year minus the previous year’s


protested ad valorem tax revenues held as prescribed


in Section 2884 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


by one thousand (1,000) and subtract the quotient from


the product of subparagraph a of this paragraph. The


remainder shall not be less than zero (0).


c. Multiply the number of mills levied for general fund


purposes above the fifteen (15) mills required to


support Foundation Aid pursuant to division (1) of


subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of this subsection, not


including the county four-mill levy, by the remainder


of subparagraph b of this paragraph. The product


shall be the Salary Incentive Aid of the district.



Req. No. 167 Page 15


E. By June 30, 1998, the State Department of Education shall


develop and the Department and all school districts shall have


implemented a student identification system which is consistent with


the provisions of subsections C D and D E of Section 3111 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes. The student identification system


shall be used specifically for the purpose of reporting enrollment


data by school sites and by school districts, the administration of


the Oklahoma School Testing Program Act, the collection of


appropriate and necessary data pursuant to the Oklahoma Educational


Indicators Program, determining student enrollment, establishing a


student mobility rate, allocation of the State Aid Formula, and


midyear adjustments in funding for student growth. This enrollment


data shall be submitted to the State Department of Education in


accordance with rules promulgated by the State Board of Education.


Funding for the development, implementation, personnel training, and


maintenance of the student identification system shall be set out in


a separate line item in the allocation section of the appropriation


bill for the State Board of Education for each year.


F. 1. In the event that ad valorem taxes of a school district


are determined to be uncollectible because of bankruptcy, clerical


error, or a successful tax protest, and the amount of such taxes


deemed uncollectible exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or


an amount greater than twenty-five percent (25%) of ad valorem taxes


per tax year, or the valuation of a district is lowered by order of

Req. No. 167 Page 16


the State Board of Equalization, the school district’s State Aid,


for the school year that such ad valorem taxes are calculated in the


State Aid Formula, shall be determined by subtracting the net


assessed valuation of the property upon which taxes were deemed


uncollectible from the assessed valuation of the school district and


the state. Upon request of the local board of education, it shall


be the duty of the county assessor to certify to the Director of


Finance of the State Department of Education the net assessed


valuation of the property upon which taxes were determined


uncollectible.


2. In the event that the amount of funds a school district


receives for reimbursement from the Ad Valorem Reimbursement Fund is


less than the amount of funds claimed for reimbursement by the


school district due to insufficiency of funds as provided in Section


193 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, then the school district’s


assessed valuation for the school year that such ad valorem


reimbursement is calculated in the State Aid Formula shall be


adjusted accordingly.


G. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 18-112.2 of


this title, a school district shall have its State Aid reduced by an


amount equal to the amount of carryover in the general fund of the


district as of June 30 of the preceding fiscal year, that is in


excess of the following standards for two (2) consecutive years:


Total Amount of Amount of

Req. No. 167 Page 17


General Fund Collections, General Fund


Excluding Previous Year Balance


Cash Surplus as of June 30 Allowable


Less than $1,000,000 48%


$1,000,000 - $2,999,999 42%


$3,000,000 - $3,999,999 36%


$4,000,000 - $4,999,999 30%


$5,000,000 - $5,999,999 24%


$6,000,000 - $7,999,999 22%


$8,000,000 - $9,999,999 19%


$10,000,000 or more 17%


2. By February 1 the State Department of Education shall send


by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to each school


district superintendent, auditor, and regional accreditation officer


a notice of and calculation sheet reflecting the general fund


balance penalty to be assessed against that school district.


Calculation of the general fund balance penalty shall not include


federal revenue. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of this written


notice the school district shall submit to the Department a written


reply either accepting or protesting the penalty to be assessed


against the district. If protesting, the school district shall


submit with its reply the reasons for rejecting the calculations and


documentation supporting those reasons. The Department shall review


all school district penalty protest documentation and notify each

Req. No. 167 Page 18


district by March 15 of its finding and the final penalty to be


assessed to each district. General fund balance penalties shall be


assessed to all school districts by April 1.


3. Any school district which receives proceeds from a tax


settlement or a Federal Emergency Management Agency settlement


during the last two (2) months of the preceding fiscal year shall be


exempt from the penalties assessed in this subsection, if the


penalty would occur solely as a result of receiving funds from the


tax settlement.


4. Any school district which receives an increase in State Aid


because of a change in Foundation and/or Salary Incentive Aid


factors during the last two (2) months of the preceding fiscal year


shall be exempt from the penalties assessed in this subsection, if


the penalty would occur solely as a result of receiving funds from


the increase in State Aid.


5. If a school district does not receive Foundation and/or


Salary Incentive Aid during the preceding fiscal year, the State


Board of Education may waive the penalty assessed in this subsection


if the penalty would result in a loss of more than forty percent


(40%) of the remaining State Aid to be allocated to the school


district between April 1 and the remainder of the school year and if


the Board determines the penalty will cause the school district not


to meet remaining financial obligations.



Req. No. 167 Page 19


6. Any school district which receives gross production revenue


apportionment during the 2002-2003 school year or in any subsequent


school year that is greater than the gross production revenue


apportionment of the preceding school year shall be exempt from the


penalty assessed in this subsection, if the penalty would occur


solely as a result of the gross production revenue apportionment, as


determined by the State Board of Education.


7. Beginning July 1, 2003, school districts that participate in


consolidation or annexation pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma School Consolidation and Annexation Act shall be exempt


from the penalty assessed in this subsection for the school year in


which the consolidation or annexation occurs and for the next three


(3) fiscal years.


8. Any school district which receives proceeds from a sales tax


levied by a municipality pursuant to Section 22-159 of Title 11 of


the Oklahoma Statutes or proceeds from a sales tax levied by a


county pursuant to Section 1370 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes


during the 2003-2004 school year or the 2004-2005 school year shall


be exempt from the penalties assessed in this subsection, if the


penalty would occur solely as a result of receiving funds from the


sales tax levy.


9. Any school district which has an amount of carryover in the


general fund of the district in excess of the limits established in


paragraph 1 of this subsection during the fiscal years beginning

Req. No. 167 Page 20


July 1, 2020, July 1, 2021, July 1, 2022, and July 1, 2023, shall


not be assessed a general fund balance penalty as provided for in


this subsection.


10. For purposes of calculating the general fund balance


penalty, the terms “carryover” and “general fund balance” shall not


include federal revenue.


H. In order to provide startup funds for the implementation of


early childhood programs, State Aid may be advanced to school


districts that initially start early childhood instruction at a


school site. School districts that desire such advanced funding


shall make application to the State Department of Education no later


than September 15 of each year and advanced funding shall be awarded


to the approved districts no later than October 30. The advanced


funding shall not exceed the per pupil amount of State Aid as


calculated in subsection D of this section per anticipated Head


Start eligible student. The total amount of advanced funding shall


be proportionately reduced from the monthly payments of the


district’s State Aid payments during the last six (6) months of the


same fiscal year.


I. H. 1. Beginning July 1, 1996, the Oklahoma Tax Commission,


notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, shall report


monthly to the State Department of Education the monthly


apportionment of the following information:


a. the assessed valuation of property,

Req. No. 167 Page 21


b. motor vehicle collections,


c. R.E.A. tax collected, and


d. gross productions tax collected.


2. Beginning July 1, 1997, the State Auditor and Inspector’s


Office of the State Auditor and Inspector, notwithstanding any


provision of law to the contrary, shall report monthly to the State


Department of Education the monthly apportionment of the proceeds of


the county levy.


3. Beginning July 1, 1996, the Commissioners of the Land


Office, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, shall


report monthly to the State Department of Education the monthly


apportionment of state apportionment.


4. Beginning July 1, 1997, the county treasurers’ offices,


notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, shall report


monthly to the State Department of Education the ad valorem tax


protest amounts for each county.


5. The information reported by the Tax Commission, the State


Auditor and Inspector’s Office of the State Auditor and Inspector,


the county treasurers’ offices, and the Commissioners of the Land


Office, pursuant to this subsection shall be reported by a school


district on forms developed by the State Department of Education.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 18-200.1, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 488, O.S.L. 2021, is hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 167 Page 22


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-167 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:44 AM





































Req. No. 167 Page 23